Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2977.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-1121, to read: START_STATUTE38-1121. Law enforcement officers; face coverings; law enforcement agency; policy; applicability; definitions A. A law enforcement officer may not wear a facial COVERING that conceals or obscures the law enforcement officer's face while on duty. B. A law enforcement agency in this state shall maintain and publicly post on its website a policy regarding the use of facial coverings by the law enforcement agency's officers that includes both of the following: 1. A purpose statement that affirms the law enforcement agency's commitment to Transparency, accountability and public trust and that Restricts the use of facial coverings to specific and limited circumstances. 2. that sworn law ENFORCEMENT officers may not use a facial covering when performing their duties, except for either of the following: (a) Active undercover operations or assignments that are authorized by the agency or a court order. (b) Tactical operations where protective gear is required for physical safety. C. This section does not apply to an officer assigned to special weapons and tactics team units while ACTIVELY performing the officer's RESPONSIBILITIES. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Facial covering": (a) means any of the following an opaque mask, garment, helmet, headgear or other item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of an individual, including a balaclava, tactical mask, gator or ski mask or any similar type of facial covering or face-shielding item. (b) Does not include: (i) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not conceal the law enforcement officer's facial identity. (ii) A medical mask or surgical mask that is used to protect against the transmission of disease or infection. (iii) any other mask, helmet or device, including air purifying respirators, full or half masks or a self-contained breathing apparatus, that is necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, gas, smoke, inclement weather or other hazardous or harmful environmental condition. (iv) A mask, helmet or device, including a self-contained breathing apparatus, that is necessary for underwater use. (v) a motorcycle helmet when worn by a law enforcement officer using a motorcycle or other vehicle that requires a helmet for safe operations WHILE ON duty. (vi) Eyewear that is necessary to protect from the use of retinal weapons or lasers. 2. "Law enforcement agency": (a) means a municipal police department, a county sheriff's office, a publicly funded law enforcement department and the department of public safety. (b) includes any federal law enforcement officer or agent who has the power to make arrests pursuant to federal law. END_STATUTE